California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 (c) If ordered by the commissioner, other structural pest control licensees shall appear in person at the office of the commissioner to complete registration.

(d) The commissioner may levy a civil penalty against any person who violates the provisions of this section in accordance with the procedures provided in Section 12999.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any licensed Branch 1 Structural Pest Controller licensee, including structural pest control operators, field representatives, applicators, and Structural Pest Control Board (SPCB) registered companies, as defined in Section 8506.1 of the Business and Professions Code, to conduct fumigations in any county unless that person or company has also registered for the current calendar year with the commissioner in that county. The registration fee for the SPCB registered company including structural pest control operators and field representatives and applicators shall be set by the county Board of Supervisors, but shall not exceed the cost of processing the registration or twenty-five dollars ($25), whichever is less. Payment of the fee shall be due at registration or on a date set by the commissioner. Structural pest control operators and field representatives may be added during the year, but the fee shall not exceed the actual cost of processing the registration or ten dollars ($10), whichever is less.

(b) Each registration shall be in the form prescribed by the director after consulting with the SPCB and the commissioners and shall include the name and address of the SPCB registered company or structural pest control operator and all satellite offices conducting business in the county, the name of the qualifying manager or the structural pest control operator and his or her license number, and a business telephone number. The registration form for field representatives and applicators shall include their name, license number, business address, and telephone number, and may be included with the business registration.

(c) Each licensed structural pest controller, including structural pest control operators, field representatives, applicators, or an SPCB registered company, that intends to conduct fumigation operations is required to appear in person at the office of the commissioner to complete the registration required by Section 15204.

(d) Each SPCB registered company or structural pest control operator that intends to conduct fumigation operations shall notify the agricultural commissioner at least 24 hours prior to commencing fumigation, or as approved on a case-by-case basis by the commissioner. This notice shall include all of the following:

(1) Name and address of the registered company or structural pest control operator.

(2) Address of the area or areas to be fumigated.

(3) The pesticide to be applied.

(4) The date of the intended application.

(e) The commissioner may levy a civil penalty against any person who violates the provisions of this section in accordance with the procedures provided in Section 12999.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 338, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.6.

A commissioner may require full payment of any delinquent fees due to the county pursuant to Section 8698.1 of the Business and Professions Code as a condition of registering a structural pest control licensee to operate a structural pest control business in that county pursuant to Sections 15204 and 15204.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 596, Sec. 6.   (AB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15205.

(a) Each registered structural pest control company shall make all existing records pertaining to pesticide and device use available to the director, the Structural Pest Control Board, or commissioner upon demand at the headquarters of the business during normal business hours. A registered structural pest control company or licensee may not prohibit onsite inspection for compliance with the Business and Professions Code and this division regarding pesticides and structural pest control devices and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Except as provided in Section 8505.5 of the Business and Professions Code, nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a registered structural pest control
 company or licensee to provide advance notice of the date, time, location of the application, type of device or pesticide application, or any other related information unless the information is contained in existing records available to the registered company or licensee, in which case the director, the Structural Pest Control Board, or commissioner may require that this information be produced at the company’s place of business.

(b) Information and documents gathered by the director, the Structural Pest Control Board, or the commissioner pursuant to this section that are protected from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall remain confidential while in the director’s, the board’s, or the commissioner’s possession.

(c) (1) “Device,” for purposes of this section, means any method, instrument, or contrivance intended to be used to prevent,
 eliminate, destroy, repel, attract, or mitigate any wood destroying pest, but does not include firearms, pesticides as defined in Section 12753, or equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold separately from a pesticide.

(2) “Wood destroying pest,” for purposes of this section, includes, but is not limited to, insects such as wood borers and termites. “Wood destroying pest” does not include wood-decaying fungi, general household pests such as cockroaches, or vertebrate pests such as rats and mice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 124.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

15206.

If the director receives a notice pursuant to Section 8616.6 of the Business and Professions Code, he or she shall investigate the actions which caused the filing of the notice and take appropriate action as authorized in this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 766, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

15206.5.

Regulations adopted pursuant to Section 11503 are not applicable to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 766, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

15206.6.

The director and the Structural Pest Control Board shall jointly develop and concur in the list of the types of violations that the commissioners shall refer to the board for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 766, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Structural Pest Control Devices [15300. - 15340.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [15300. - 15300.]

15300.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Structural pest control device” or “device” means any method, instrument, or contrivance intended to be used to prevent, eliminate, destroy, repel, attract, or mitigate any wood destroying pest, but does not include firearms, pesticides as defined in Section 12753, or equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold separately from a pesticide.

(b) “Wood destroying pest” includes, but is not limited to, insects such as wood borers and termites. “Wood destroying pest” does not include wood-decaying fungi, general household pests such as cockroaches, or vertebrate pests such as rats and mice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [15301. - 15303.]

15301.

(a) On and after July 1, 2001, it is unlawful for any person directly, or through another, to manufacture for sale, advertise, deliver or otherwise provide, offer for sale or lease, sell, lease, possess, or use any device in this state that is not registered pursuant to this chapter, or for which the registration has been suspended or canceled, except as provided in subdivision (b), any other provision of this chapter, regulations adopted by the director, or a notice or order of suspension or cancellation of a device.

(b) For devices in use in California prior to January 1, 2001, the director may grant reasonable extensions of time for the submission or review, or both the submission and review, of data in support of an application for registration. Before the director may grant an extension of time, the applicant shall have made a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of this chapter and shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director that circumstances beyond the applicant’s control were the primary cause of the delay.

(c) This section does not apply to any device manufactured solely for export outside this state and which is so exported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15302.

The director shall regulate structural pest control devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15303.

The director may adopt, amend, repeal, and enforce regulations relating to the regulation of devices and the administration of this chapter. When adopting regulations pursuant to this chapter, the director shall consider the safe use of devices and safe working conditions for persons handling, storing, or using devices or working in and about device treated areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Device Registration [15305. - 15320.]

15305.

(a) The director shall endeavor to prevent and eliminate from use in this state any device that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) The device endangers human health or safety, property, or the environment.

(2) The device is not beneficial or efficacious for the purposes for which it is manufactured for sale, advertised, delivered or otherwise provided, offered for sale or lease, sold, leased, possessed, or used.

(3) Is misrepresented.

(b) The director may establish specific criteria to evaluate a device. The director may establish performance standards and tests of structural pest control devices, which are to be conducted by the applicant for registration, registrant, or parties interested in the registration of the device.

(c) Before a device is registered, the director shall conduct, or cause to be conducted, a thorough and timely evaluation of the device. The director may impose reporting requirements and restrictions upon the use of a device, including, but not limited to, limitations on area and manner of application. The director may reevaluate any registered device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15306.

The director shall not determine a device to be beneficial or efficacious if any of the following exists:

(a) The ability of the device to control pests falls below the standard or quality that the device is represented to have, or the device is of little or no value for the purpose for which it is intended.

(b) Any component or subsystem that is necessary to the effectiveness of the device has been wholly or partially omitted in its manufacture, or other materials have been substituted for that component or subsystem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15307.

Every manufacturer of, importer of, vender of, or dealer in, any device, except a dealer or agent that sells a registered device, shall obtain a certificate of device registration from the director before the device is manufactured for sale, advertised, delivered or otherwise provided, offered for sale or lease, sold, leased, possessed, or used, in this state, unless the device is used under a valid device research permit pursuant to Section 15314.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15308.

Each applicant for registration of a device, at a minimum, shall submit all of the following:

(a) A completed application form prescribed by the director.

(b) Proposed labeling for the device.

(c) Valid data supporting each claim on the proposed label and supporting the safety of the device for each proposed labeled use.

(d) A nonrefundable application fee in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200). The application fees shall be deposited in the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund and shall be available, upon appropriation, for use by the department in administering this division.

(e) Any other information required by regulation of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15309.

Within a timely manner after receipt of the information and fee specified in Section 15308, the director shall do one or more of the following:

(a) Issue a certificate of device registration pursuant to Section 15310.

(b) Notify the applicant that the submission is inadequate and specify the additional data that must be submitted and reviewed before a registration decision is rendered. In issuing a notification pursuant to this subdivision, the director may specify a reasonable timeframe for the submission of the additional data, moneys, labeling, or information to avoid a requirement for submission of a new application and application fee.

(c) Notify the applicant of the director’s decision to deny registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15310.

If an applicant for registration of a device complies with this chapter and the regulations that are adopted pursuant to this chapter, the director shall register the device and issue a certificate of device registration to the applicant authorizing the manufacture and sale of the device in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15311.

If the director finds that registration must be denied due to noncompliance with this chapter or the regulations that are adopted pursuant to this chapter, the director shall deny registration. Upon the request of the applicant, the director may hold a hearing to reconsider the director’s decision to deny the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15312.

Each applicant for a certificate of device registration shall inform the director of every brand and trademark of a device that the applicant intends to manufacture for sale, advertise, deliver or otherwise provide, offer for sale or lease, sell, lease, possess, or use. The director may require an applicant to identify each component in the device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15313.

The registrant of a device shall immediately notify the director of any proposed change to the device including, but not limited to, labeling composition, configuration method of application, and use of the device. The director shall determine whether the changes require the director’s approval before the changed device may be manufactured for sale, advertised, delivered or otherwise provided, offered for sale or lease, sold, leased, possessed, or used in this state. The director shall notify the registrant of this determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15314.

The director may issue a device research permit for the scientific evaluation of new devices for a limited period of time determined by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15315.

(a) Pursuant to Sections 15305 and 15306, after providing notice to the device registrant or applicant of an opportunity to be heard, the director may cancel the registration of, or refuse to register, any device that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) The director determines that the device has demonstrated serious uncontrollable adverse effects on human health or safety, property, or the environment.

(2) The director determines that the use of the device is of less public value or greater detriment to the environment than the benefit received by its use.

(3) The director determines that a false or misleading statement is made or implied by the registrant or his or her agent, or the applicant for registration, either verbally or in writing, or in the form of any advertising literature concerning the device.

(4) The director determines that the registrant, or his or her agent, or applicant for registration has failed to report any adverse effect or risk as required by Section 15316.

(5) The director determines that the registrant has failed to comply with the requirements of a reevaluation of the registrant’s device.

(6) The director determines that false information relating to the testing of the device, including the nature of any protocol, procedure, substance, organism, or equipment used, observation made, or conclusion or opinion formed, was submitted to the director.

(b) When taking action or making a determination pursuant to this section, the director may require practical demonstrations and scientific testing that the director finds are necessary to determine the facts. The demonstrations or testing shall be conducted by the applicant for registration, registrant, or parties interested in the device registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15316.

If, during the registration process, or at any time after the registration of a device, the applicant or registrant has factual or scientific information showing any adverse effect or risk of the device to human health or safety, property, or the environment that has not been previously submitted to the director, the applicant for registration or the registrant, as the case may be, shall immediately submit the information to the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15317.

If the director has reason to believe that any of the conditions stated in Section 15315 are applicable to any registered device and that the use or continued use of the device constitutes an immediate substantial danger to human health or safety, property, or the environment, the director, after notice to the registrant, may suspend the registration of that device pending a hearing and final decision. If the director does not file an accusation pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code within 30 days from the date of the suspension, the suspension shall be terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15318.

The director may cancel a certificate of device registration, or refuse to issue a certificate of device registration to any manufacturer, importer, or dealer in any device that repeatedly violates this chapter or the regulations of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15319.

Action by the director pursuant to Section 15305, 15311, 15315, 15317, or 15318 is not a condition precedent to the institution of any action to prosecute or levy a civil penalty for a violation of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15320.

(a) A registrant at any time may request that the registration of any of its devices be voluntarily canceled. The request shall be in writing to the director and shall include a waiver of the registrant’s right to a hearing on the cancellation.

(b) The director shall mail a notice of voluntary cancellation of registration of the device to the registrant. The notice shall specify the effective date of the cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Labeling and Warranty [15325. - 15327.]

15325.

The registrant of a device shall furnish printed directions for use on the label or shall enclose the printed directions with the device. The device label shall state the name, brand, or trademark, if any, under which the device will be sold and the name and address of the device manufacturer, importer, dealer, or vendor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15326.

(a) The registrant of a device may print limitations of warranty on the label with respect to the use of the device, as the registrant considers proper.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no limitations of warranty by the device manufacturer, registrant, user, seller, lessor, or licensor shall exclude or waive either of the following implied warranties:

(1) That the device corresponds to all claims and descriptions that the registrant has made in print regarding the device.

(2) That the device is reasonably fit for use for any purpose for which it is intended according to any printed statement of the registrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15327.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the registrant is not liable for any injury or damage that is suffered solely by reason of any of the following:

(a) The use of the device for a purpose different from that represented by the label.

(b) The use of the device contrary to the printed directions of the registrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Seizure [15330. - 15330.]

15330.

(a) If any device is determined to be manufactured for sale, advertised, delivered or otherwise provided, offered for sale or lease, sold, leased, possessed, or used in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or if the device has been, or is intended to be, manufactured for sale, advertised, delivered or otherwise provided, offered for sale or lease, sold, leased, possessed, or used in violation of those provisions, or when the registration of the device has been canceled by a final order or has been suspended, the director may issue a written “cease and desist” order to any person who owns, controls, or has custody of the device. After receipt of the cease and desist order, the receiver of the order shall not manufacture for sale, advertise, deliver or otherwise provide, offer for sale or lease, sell, lease, possess, or use the device described in the order except in accordance with the provisions of the order.

(b) The director may seize or quarantine any device that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) The device is not registered pursuant to this chapter or any of the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Any of the claims made for the device or any of the directions for its use differs in substance from the representation made in connection with its registration.

(3) The device is misbranded or mislabeled.

(4) When used in accordance with the requirements imposed under this chapter and as directed by the labeling or printed directions, the device nevertheless causes unreasonable adverse effects on human health, human safety, human welfare, property, or the environment.

(5) The device is manufactured for sale, advertised, delivered or otherwise provided, offered for sale or lease, sold, leased, possessed, or used in violation of a cease and desist order.

(6) The device is otherwise not in conformity with this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to it.

(c) After a device is seized or quarantined, the department shall provide the person from whom the device was seized or quarantined an opportunity for a hearing.

(1) If the director determines, after a hearing is held if requested, that the device can be brought into compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, the director shall hold the device or continue the quarantine until the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter have been complied with, at which time the device shall be released to the person from whom it was seized or the quarantine shall be lifted, as the case may be.

(2) If the director determines, after a hearing is held if requested, that the device cannot be brought into compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, the director shall order the owner of the device to dispose of it in a manner prescribed by the director to protect human health, human safety, and human welfare and to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Device Usage [15331. - 15331.]

15331.

The use of any device shall not conflict with the label on the device as registered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Violations [15340. - 15340.]

15340.

(a) Except as provided by subdivision (c), it is unlawful for any person directly, indirectly, or through another, to manufacture for sale, advertise, deliver or otherwise provide, offer for sale or lease, sell, lease, possess, or use any of the following:(1) Any device that is not registered pursuant to this chapter, or whose registration has been canceled or suspended, except to the extent that the sale, lease, or other provision has been authorized by the director.

(2) Any registered device if any claim made for it as a part of its distribution or sale substantially differs from any claim made for it as a part of the information required in connection with its registration.

(3) Any registered device the configuration of which differs at the time of its sale, lease or other provision, or use from its configuration as described in the information required in connection with its registration.

(4) Any device that is misbranded or mislabeled.

(b) It is unlawful for any person directly, indirectly, or through another, to do any of the following:

(1) Violate any provision of this chapter and any rules or regulations adopted by the director pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Manufacture for sale, advertise, deliver or otherwise provide, offer for sale or lease, sell, lease, possess, or use any device, except in compliance with this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Detach, alter, deface, or destroy, in whole or in part, any device labeling.

(4) Refuse to prepare, maintain, or submit any records or reports required by the director under this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter for a registered device.

(5) Use any registered device in a manner inconsistent with its registration and labeling.

(6) Use any device that is under a valid device research permit contrary to the provisions of that permit.

(7) Violate any order issued pursuant to this chapter.

(8) Knowingly falsify all or part of any application for registration, application for a device research permit, any information submitted to the director pursuant to this chapter, any records required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter, or any report filed under this chapter.

(9) Falsify all or part of any information relating to the testing of any device, including the nature of any protocol, procedure, substance, organism, or equipment used, observation made, or conclusion or opinion formed, submitted to the director, or that the person knows will be furnished to the director or will become a part of any records required to be maintained by this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(10) Submit to the director data known to be false in support of a registration.

(c) It is not a violation of subdivision (a) for any person to manufacture for sale, transport, or use any device pursuant to a valid research permit in effect with respect to that device and that use or possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. VESSEL AND AIRCRAFT GARBAGE [16001. - 16154.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [16001. - 16006.]

16001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

“Aircraft” means every description of craft or other contrivance which is used, or capable of being used, as a means of transportation through the air from origins in other states or territories or in foreign countries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

“Food stores” means fruits, vegetables, or animal products which are carried as stores of vessels and aircraft and includes fruits, vegetables, or animal products which are carried in passengers’ and crews’ quarters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

“Garbage” means waste material, such as food scraps, table refuse, galley refuse, and refuse from stores of vessels and aircraft, including such waste material in passengers’ and crews’ quarters, which is derived, in whole or in part, from fruits, vegetables, or animal products.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

“Territorial waters of California” means all navigable waters of this state including all portions of the sea within its jurisdiction which are used by vessels or aircraft.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16006.

“Vessel” means every description of craft or other contrivance which is used, or capable of being used, as a means of transportation in or on coastal, intercoastal, or foreign waters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [16051. - 16051.]

16051.

Regulations which are adopted by the director pursuant to this division shall not conflict with Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture orders or regulations which pertain to garbage that is derived from meats or meat products which originate in any country which is listed as a country in which there are animals which are infected with the disease known as rinderpest or with foot-and-mouth disease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Containers and Receptacles [16101. - 16101.]

16101.

If means of incineration of, or other approved processing for, garbage are not available aboard any vessel or aircraft in the state, the master or other person that is in charge of such vessel or aircraft shall provide containers or receptacles with tight-fitting covers in which the garbage shall be retained while within the territorial waters of, or on the land in, California pending incineration or approved treatment under the supervision and pursuant to the regulations of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Violations [16151. - 16154.]

16151.

It is unlawful for any person to throw, discharge, deposit, remove, or carry garbage, or cause, suffer, or procure garbage to be thrown, discharged, deposited, removed, or carried, from any vessel, aircraft, or any other vehicle into any territorial waters, or onto land within the state, except for any of the following:

(a) Immediate burning in incinerators.

(b) Approved treatment or approved disposal under the supervision and pursuant to the regulations of the director.

(c) Delivery to a garbage collector that, for the purpose of accepting garbage, is licensed by the director or by the federal government.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16152.

It is unlawful for any person to retain or maintain garbage on any vessel, aircraft, or other vehicle within the state, except in tightly closed containers or receptacles and under such treatment as may be prescribed by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16153.

It is unlawful for any person to remove food stores from any vessel, aircraft, or other vehicle except under a permit issued by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16154.

It is unlawful for any person to violate, or to aid, abet, authorize, or instigate a violation of, this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. ANIMALS GENERALLY [16301. - 19700.]



PART 1. ANIMALS AT LARGE [16301. - 17153.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [16301. - 16303.]

16301.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16302.

“Animal” includes any domestic bovine animal, horse, mule, burro, sheep, goat, or swine, or the hide, carcass, or portion of a carcass of any such animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16303.

“Inspector” means a hide and brand inspector. It includes the persons who are specified in Section 20010.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [16401. - 16461.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application [16401. - 16401.]

16401.

This part, including the provisions regarding payment of fees, is applicable to all state and county institutions engaging in livestock operations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Investigation [16411. - 16411.]

16411.

The director may make any and all necessary investigations relative to reported violations of this part pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Criminal Penalty [16421. - 16421.]

16421.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this part or in subdivision (b), every person that violates this part is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment. Each violation during any day shall constitute a separate offense.

(b) Every person who violates the following is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment. Each violation during any day shall constitute a separate offense:

(1) Article 1 (commencing with Section 16501) of Chapter 3.

(2) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16801).

(3) Article 5 (commencing with Section 17121) of Chapter 7.

(4) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 17150).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Civil Penalties and Remedies [16441. - 16443.]

16441.

Any person that violates any provision of this part or any regulations issued pursuant to it is liable civilly for a penalty in an amount not to exceed a sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. Any money recovered under this section shall be paid into the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16442.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring action for civil penalties in the name of the people of this state in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16443.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court for an injunction against any person violating any provision of this part or any regulation which is duly issued by the director pursuant to it.

Any proceedings pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Funds [16461. - 16461.]

16461.

Any money in the Department of Agriculture Fund derived under any of the provisions of this part may be expended for the administration and enforcement of any of the provisions of the following portions of this code, notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting the expenditure of any such money to some specific purpose or to the administration or enforcement of some specific section, article, or chapter of this part:

(a) Part 1 (commencing with Section 16301) and Part 2 (commencing with Section 17401), Division 9.

(b) Division 10 (commencing with Section 20001).

(c) Division 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Pedigree and Proof of Ownership [16501. - 16527.]



  ARTICLE 1. Pedigree [16501. - 16501.]

16501.

It is unlawful for any person by any false or fraudulent pretense to do any of the following:
